Colorado statutes. TITLE 16 Criminal Proceedings
ARTICLE 11.3
COLORADO COMMISSION ON
CRIMINAL AND JUVENILE JUSTICE

Section

16-11.3-101. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly finds and declares that:

Ensuring public safety and respecting the rights of victims are paramount concerns of the citizens of Colorado;

Improving the effective administration of justice involves a comprehensive examination of, and recommendations regarding, the criminal and juvenile justice systems;

Current commitments to the department of corrections require expending a significant percentage of the state budget for incarceration of offenders;

The number of offenders projected to be sentenced in the future will require that an even greater percentage of the state budget be dedicated to incarceration;

The rate of recidivism is high, resulting in the return of many offenders to the justice system with additional significant expense;

It is in the interest of the people of the state of Colorado to maintain public safety through the most cost-effective use of limited criminal justice resources;

Many factors may contribute to an offender's criminal behavior, including but not limited to substance abuse and substance use disorders, behavioral or mental health disorders, poverty, child abuse, domestic violence, and educational deficiencies. Factors contributing to criminal conduct and re-victimization are frequently not addressed adequately within the justice system.

Appropriate intervention in a child's life through the juvenile justice system or prevention programs may limit or prevent future criminal conduct;

It is in the best interest of the public to engage in a comprehensive, evidence-based analysis of the circumstances and characteristics of the offenders being sentenced to the department of corrections, the alternatives to incarceration, the effectiveness of prevention programs, and the effectiveness of the criminal code and sentencing laws in securing public safety.

Therefore, the general assembly declares that a commission comprised of experts in criminal justice, corrections, mental and behavioral health, drug abuse, victims' rights, higher education, juvenile justice, local government, and other pertinent disciplines shall be formed to engage in an evidence-based analysis of the criminal justice system in Colorado and annually report to the governor, the speaker of the house of representatives, the president of the senate, and the chief justice of the Colorado supreme court.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article added, p. 1100, § 1, effective May 23.

L. 2017:

(1)(g) and (2) amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1298, § 122, effective May 25.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 17-242, see section 1 of chapter 263, Session Laws of Colorado 2017.

16-11.3-102. Colorado commission on criminal and juvenile justice - creation - membership - operation.

There is hereby created in the department of public safety the Colorado commission on criminal and juvenile justice, referred to in this article as the "commission". The commission shall have the powers and duties specified in this article.

The commission is a type 2 entity, as defined in section 24-1-105, and exercises its powers and performs its duties and functions under the department of public safety.

The commission consists of twenty-nine voting members, as follows:

The executive director of the department of public safety, or his or her designee;

The executive director of the department of corrections, or his or her designee;

The executive director of the department of human services, or his or her designee;

The executive director of the department of higher education, or his or her designee;

The attorney general, or his or her designee;

(V.5) The executive director of the Colorado district attorneys' council, or his or her designee, and one elected district attorney, to be designated by the Colorado district attorneys' council;

The state public defender, or his or her designee;

The chairperson of the state board of parole, or his or her designee;

The chairperson of the juvenile parole board, or his or her designee;

Two members appointed by the chief justice of the Colorado supreme court from the judicial branch, at least one of whom shall be a current or retired judge;

Four members of the general assembly appointed as follows:

One member appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives;

One member appointed by the minority leader of the house of representatives;

One member appointed by the president of the senate; and

One member appointed by the minority leader of the senate; and

Thirteen members appointed by the governor as follows:

A representative of a police department;

A representative of a sheriff's department;

An expert in juvenile justice issues;

Repealed.

A county commissioner;

A criminal defense attorney;

A representative of a victims' rights organization;

One member who is a representative of a community corrections provider, a community corrections board member, or a behavioral, mental health, or substance use disorder treatment provider;

One member who is a victim, as defined in section 24-4.1-302 (5), who has demonstrated knowledge of the criminal justice system and its impacts;

A person who is a former offender who has demonstrated knowledge of the criminal justice system and its impacts;

A representative of a nonprofit organization representing municipalities;

A victim's advocate, as defined in section 13-90-107 (1)(k)(II); and

Two members who shall be appointed at-large.

The director of the division of criminal justice in the department of public safety shall serve as a nonvoting member of the commission.

The appointed members of the commission shall serve terms of three years; except that the terms shall be staggered so that no more than twelve members' terms expire in the same year. The members appointed after the initial two-year terms shall serve three-year terms.

An appointed member shall not serve more than two consecutive full terms, in addition to any partial term. In the event of a vacancy in an appointed position by death, resignation, removal for misconduct, incompetence, neglect of duty, or otherwise, the appointing authority shall appoint a member to fill the position for the remainder of the unexpired term.

A person who has been appointed and subsequently reappointed to the commission by the same governor in any capacity described in subsection (2)(a)(XI) of this section may not be appointed by the same governor to serve in any other capacity described in said subsection (2)(a)(XI).

The governor shall select the chairperson and vice-chairperson of the commission from among its members.

The members of the commission shall serve without compensation except as otherwise provided in section 2-2-326, C.R.S., and except that the members of the commission may be reimbursed for any actual and necessary travel expenses incurred in the performance of their duties under this article.

The commission may establish by-laws as appropriate for its effective operation.

The commission shall meet at least once per month or on a schedule determined by the chairperson to review information necessary for making recommendations.

Members of the commission, employees, and consultants shall be immune from suit in any civil action based upon any official act performed in good faith pursuant to this article.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article added, p. 1101, § 1, effective May 23.

L. 2014:

(4)(b) amended, (SB 14-153), ch. 390, p. 1961, § 8, effective June 6.

L. 2017:

IP(2)(a) and (2)(a)(XI)(H) amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1298, § 123, effective May 25.

L. 2018:

IP(2)(a), IP(2)(a)(XI), (2)(a)(XI)(H), (2)(a)(XI)(I), and (3)(b) amended, (2)(a)(V.5), (2)(a)(XI)(J), (2)(a)(XI)(K), (2)(a)(XI)(L), (2)(a)(XI)(M), and (3)(c) added, and (2)(a)(XI)(D) repealed, (HB 18-1287), ch. 318, p. 1909, § 3, effective May 30.

L. 2022:

(3)(a) and (3)(b) amended, (SB 22-013), ch. 2, p. 23, § 26, effective February 25; (1)(b) amended, (SB 22-162), ch. 469, p. 3426, § 207, effective August 10.

Cross references:

(1) For the legislative declaration in SB 17-242, see section 1 of chapter 263, Session Laws of Colorado 2017.

(2) For the short title (the "Debbie Haskins 'Administrative Organization Act of 1968' Modernization Act") in SB 22-162, see section 1 of chapter 469, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

16-11.3-103. Duties of the commission - mission - staffing - report - definition.

The mission of the commission is to enhance public safety, to ensure justice, and to ensure protection of the rights of victims through the cost-effective use of public resources. The work of the commission will focus on evidence-based recidivism reduction initiatives and the cost-effective expenditure of limited criminal justice funds.

The commission has the following duties:

To conduct an empirical analysis of and collect evidence-based data on sentencing policies and practices, including but not limited to the effectiveness of the sentences imposed in meeting the purposes of sentencing and the need to prevent recidivism and revictimization;

To investigate effective alternatives to incarceration, the factors contributing to recidivism, evidence-based recidivism reduction initiatives, and cost-effective crime prevention programs;

To make an annual report of findings and recommendations, including evidence-based analysis and data;

To study and evaluate the outcomes of commission recommendations as implemented;

To conduct and review studies, including but not limited to work and resources compiled by other states, and make recommendations concerning policies and practices in the criminal and juvenile justice systems. The areas of study shall include, but are not limited to, the reduction of racial and ethnic disparities within the criminal and juvenile justice systems. The commission shall prioritize areas of study based on the potential impact on crime and corrections and the resources available for conducting the work.

To work with other state-established boards, task forces, or commissions that study or address criminal justice issues;

To study whether existing criminal statutes address abuse of a child or youth in a facility and issue corresponding recommendations concerning any identified gaps in law that may need to be addressed. On or before July 1, 2019, the commission shall provide a report with its findings and recommendations to the judiciary and the public health care and human services committees of the house of representatives and the judiciary and the health and human services committees of the senate, or any successor committees.

As used in this subsection (2)(g), "facility" means a residential child care facility, specialized group facility, foster care home, or any other facility licensed pursuant to part 9 of article 6 of title 26; family child care home licensed pursuant to part 3 of article 5 of title 26.5; noncertified kinship care providers that provide care for children with an open child welfare case who are in the legal custody of a county department; or a facility or community placement, as described in section 19-2.5-1502, for a juvenile committed to the custody of the department of human services. "Facility" does not include any adult detention or correctional facility.

Repealed.

(2.5) (a) Using empirical analysis and evidence-based data, the commission shall study sentences in Colorado.

Repealed.

(2.7) to (2.9) Repealed.

The commission shall establish advisory committees that focus on specific subject matters and make recommendations to the full commission. The chairperson of the commission shall select the chairpersons for the advisory committees as well as the commission members to serve on the advisory committees. The chairperson of an advisory committee may select noncommission members from interested members of the community to serve on the advisory committee. Each advisory committee shall make findings and recommendations for consideration by the commission. Noncommission members of an advisory committee shall serve without compensation and without reimbursement for expenses.

The commission, at its discretion, may respond to inquiries referred by members of the general assembly, the governor, and the chief justice of the Colorado supreme court, as resources allow.

The division of criminal justice in the department of public safety, in consultation with the department of corrections, shall provide resources for data collection, research, analysis, and publication of the commission's findings and reports.

Upon the request of the commission, the office of legislative legal services created pursuant to section 2-3-501, C.R.S., shall provide a staff member to attend meetings of the commission.

The commission is encouraged to create and make publicly available a document describing the provisions of section 18-1-711, C.R.S.

On or before May 1 of each even-numbered year, the commission shall request a letter from the governor suggesting topics for the commission to study. In preparing the letter, the governor is encouraged to consult with the chief justice of the Colorado supreme court and the majority and minority leaders of the house of representatives and the senate.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article added, p. 1103, § 1, effective May 23.

L. 2008:

(2)(e) amended, p. 96, § 1, effective March 19.

L. 2009:

(2.5) added, (SB 09-286), ch. 338, p. 1784, § 2, effective June 1.

L. 2012:

(6) added, (SB 12-020), ch. 225, p. 988, § 3, effective May 29; (2.7) added, (HB 12-1310), ch. 268, p. 1403, § 28, effective June 7.

L. 2013:

(2.8) added, (SB 13-283), ch. 332, p. 1890, § 5, effective May 28; (5) amended, (SB 13-007), ch. 334, p. 1945, § 2, effective May 28.

L. 2018:

IP(2) amended and (2)(g) added, (HB 18-1346), ch. 326, p. 1963, § 1, effective May 30; (7) added, (HB 18-1287), ch. 318, p. 1910, § 4, effective May 30.

L. 2019:

(2.9) added, (HB 19-1149), ch. 141, p. 1744, § 1, effective May 3; (2)(h) added, (SB 19-008), ch. 275, p. 2593, § 1, effective August 2.

L. 2021:

(2)(g)(II) amended, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 713, § 26, effective October 1.

L. 2022:

(2)(g)(II) amended, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 829, § 33, effective July 1.

16-11.3-103.3. Study of access to community corrections programs for persons convicted of misdemeanors - task force - repeal.

On or before July 1, 2022, the commission shall establish a task force to examine and make findings and recommendations to the commission concerning whether it is appropriate to improve access to community corrections programs for persons convicted of misdemeanors, including:

An analysis of the population convicted of misdemeanors, including crimes of conviction and assessed risk by gender, age, race, and ethnicity;

The services provided by community corrections programs that may be beneficial to persons convicted of misdemeanors;

Which persons convicted of misdemeanors, based on their assessed risk, would benefit from services provided by community corrections programs;

The ability to provide services to persons convicted of misdemeanors that align with their assessed risk using existing community corrections program resources;

Parameters for persons convicted of misdemeanors to access services at residential and nonresidential community corrections programs;

What costs persons convicted of misdemeanors are responsible for at community corrections programs;

What funding is necessary for community corrections programs to serve persons convicted of misdemeanors; and

What changes, including legislation, are necessary for community corrections programs to better serve persons convicted of misdemeanors.

The task force shall convene on or before July 29, 2022. The commission chairperson shall select task force members, who may include commission members or noncommission members who are interested members of the community. To the best of the commission chairperson's ability, the chairperson must ensure that the composition of the task force is racially, ethnically, and geographically diverse and is representative of the communities that are most impacted by the criminal and juvenile justice system. The commission chairperson shall select the task force's chairperson and vice-chairperson. The task force consists of the following voting members, unless stated otherwise:

Three representatives from community corrections programs, at least one of whom represents a rural community corrections program. Of the three representatives, only one is a voting member.

One representative who is a board member of a community corrections board;

One representative who was placed and participated in a residential community corrections program;

One representative from the division of criminal justice in the department of public safety;

One sheriff, or the sheriff's designee;

One chief probation officer of the probation department in the judicial department, or the chief probation officer's designee;

One elected district attorney, or the elected district attorney's designee;

The state public defender, or the state public defender's designee;

One representative from the division of probation services in the judicial department;

One representative from an organization advocating for the rights of persons who transition from custody to the community; and

One representative from an organization advocating for victims rights.

The members of the task force serve without compensation and without reimbursement for expenses.

On or before July 1, 2023, the task force shall create a report of its findings and recommendations and submit it to the commission.

During the 2024 legislative session, the commission shall include as part of its "State Measurement for Accountable, Responsive, and Transparent (SMART) Government Act" hearing required by section 2-7-203 the findings and recommendations gathered by the task force pursuant to this section.

This section is repealed, effective July 1, 2024.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire section added, (HB 22-1368), ch. 474, p. 3457, § 1, effective June 8.

16-11.3-103.5. Study of enhanced penalties for offenses against emergency service providers - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire section added, (HB 14-1214), ch. 336, p. 1498, § 7, effective August 6.

Editor's note:

Subsection (3) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2015. (See L. 2014, p. 1498.)

16-11.3-104. Colorado commission on criminal and juvenile justice cash fund - created - donations.

The department of public safety and the commission are authorized to accept gifts, grants, or donations, including in-kind donations from private or public sources, for the purposes of this article. All private and public funds received through gifts, grants, or donations by the department of public safety or by the commission shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the Colorado commission on criminal and juvenile justice cash fund, which fund is hereby created and referred to in this article as the "cash fund". Any moneys in the cash fund not expended for the purposes of this article shall be invested by the state treasurer as provided in section 24-36-113, C.R.S. All interest and income derived from the investment and deposit of moneys in the cash fund shall be credited to the cash fund. Any unexpended and unencumbered moneys remaining in the cash fund at the end of any fiscal year shall remain in the cash fund and shall not be credited or transferred to the general fund or any other fund.

The department of public safety shall not be required to solicit gifts, grants, or donations from any source for the purposes of this article.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article added, p. 1104, § 1, effective May 23.

16-11.3-105. Repeal of article.

This article 11.3 is repealed, effective July 1, 2023. Prior to such repeal, the department of regulatory agencies shall review the commission as described in section 2-3-1203.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article added, p. 1105, § 1, effective May 23.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (SB 13-007), ch. 334, p. 1945, § 1, effective May 28.

L. 2018:

Entire section amended, (HB 18-1287), ch. 318, p. 1909, § 1, effective May 30.